Utah statutes.
48-2a-703 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Rights of creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest.  To the extent it is the beneficiary of such a charging order, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest.  This chapter does not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to his partnership interest.

